Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Revision of title. —

Laws 1988, ch. 34, §§ 1 through 3 and § 6 revised this title.

Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 1, enacted §§

42-2-201

through

42-2-203

.

Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2, repealed and reenacted former §§

42-1-101

through 42-1-125, 42-1-130 through

42-4-117

and

35-14-101

through 35-14-106 as present §§

42-1-101

through

42-5-102

.

Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 3, amended and renumbered former §§ 42-1-126 through 42-1-129 as present §§

35-13-201

through

35-13-204

.

No detailed explanation of the changes made in the 1988 act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, annotations to cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections where it was felt that they would be useful. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

1 Am. Jur. 2d Abortion and Birth Control § 1 et seq.

Social worker malpractice, 58 ALR4th 977.

Propriety of telephone testimony or hearings in public welfare proceedings, 88 ALR4th 1094.

What constitutes impairment of proposed intervenor's interest to support intervention as matter of right under Rule 24(a)(2) of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure in actions involving government-supported housing and welfare programs, 75 ALR Fed 570.

Actions under 42 USC § 1983 for violations of Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act (42 USC §§ 620 et seq. and 670 et seq.), 93 ALR Fed 314.

39A C.J.S. Health and Environment § 1 et seq.; 81 C.J.S. Social Security and Public Welfare § 1 et seq.